Utah statutes.
73-16-5.   Error in copying does not invalidate.

Any error made, if any, in copying the original compact in Section 73-16-2 hereof, shall be held not to invalidate the ratification of the compact in any way.



Enacted by Chapter 161, 1955 General Session

